Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.161

Chief of police and police department.

The department of police in a city of the second class shall be under the direction and control of the chief of police subject to the direction of the mayor. Any police officer may pursue and arrest violators of city ordinances beyond the city limits.

Every citizen shall lend the police chief aid, when required, for the arrest of offenders and maintenance of public order. With the concurrence of the mayor, the police chief may appoint additional police officers to serve for one day only under orders of the chief in the preservation of public order.

The police chief shall have the same authority as that conferred upon sheriffs for the suppression of any riot, public tumult, disturbance of the peace, or resistance against the laws or the public authorities in the lawful exercise of their functions and shall be entitled to the same protection.

The police chief shall perform such other services as may be required by statute or ordinances of the city.

[ 1994 c 81 s 40; 1987 c 3 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 316 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.160. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 27; 1893 c 70 s 12; 1890 p 195 s 136; RRS s 9141. Formerly RCW 35.24.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 316: See note following RCW 70.48.020.

Commencement of actions: Chapter 4.28 RCW.

Duties of chief law enforcement officer receiving found property: RCW 63.21.050.

Law enforcement chaplains authorized: Chapter 41.22 RCW.

Unclaimed property in hands of city police: Chapter 63.32 RCW.